Washington statutes.
RCW 10.22.030

Compromise in all other cases forbidden.

No offense can be compromised, nor can any proceedings for the prosecution or punishment thereof be stayed upon a compromise, except as provided in this chapter.

[ 1891 c 28 s 64; Code 1881 s 1043; RRS s 2128.]